Illinois, session 104th, SB46.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 5-5-3.2 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/5-5-3.2)7    Sec. 5-5-3.2. Factors in aggravation and extended-term 8sentencing. 9    (a) The following factors shall be accorded weight in 10favor of imposing a term of imprisonment or may be considered 11by the court as reasons to impose a more severe sentence under 12Section 5-8-1 or Article 4.5 of Chapter V:13        (1) the defendant's conduct caused or threatened 14    serious harm;15        (2) the defendant received compensation for committing 16    the offense;17        (3) the defendant has a history of prior delinquency 18    or criminal activity;19        (4) the defendant, by the duties of his office or by 20    his position, was obliged to prevent the particular 21    offense committed or to bring the offenders committing it 22    to justice;23        (5) the defendant held public office at the time of   SB0046- 2 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1    the offense, and the offense related to the conduct of 2    that office;3        (6) the defendant utilized his professional reputation 4    or position in the community to commit the offense, or to 5    afford him an easier means of committing it;6        (7) (blank); the sentence is necessary to deter others 7    from committing the same crime;8        (8) the defendant committed the offense against a 9    person 60 years of age or older or such person's property;10        (9) the defendant committed the offense against a 11    person who has a physical disability or such person's 12    property;13        (10) by reason of another individual's actual or 14    perceived race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, gender, 15    sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, or 16    national origin, the defendant committed the offense 17    against (i) the person or property of that individual; 18    (ii) the person or property of a person who has an 19    association with, is married to, or has a friendship with 20    the other individual; or (iii) the person or property of a 21    relative (by blood or marriage) of a person described in 22    clause (i) or (ii). For the purposes of this Section, 23    "sexual orientation" has the meaning ascribed to it in 24    paragraph (O-1) of Section 1-103 of the Illinois Human 25    Rights Act;26        (11) the offense took place in a place of worship or on   SB0046- 3 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1    the grounds of a place of worship, immediately prior to, 2    during or immediately following worship services. For 3    purposes of this subparagraph, "place of worship" shall 4    mean any church, synagogue or other building, structure or 5    place used primarily for religious worship;6        (12) the defendant was convicted of a felony committed 7    while he was on pretrial release or his own recognizance 8    pending trial for a prior felony and was convicted of such 9    prior felony, or the defendant was convicted of a felony 10    committed while he was serving a period of probation, 11    conditional discharge, or mandatory supervised release 12    under subsection (d) of Section 5-8-1 for a prior felony;13        (13) the defendant committed or attempted to commit a 14    felony while he was wearing a bulletproof vest. For the 15    purposes of this paragraph (13), a bulletproof vest is any 16    device which is designed for the purpose of protecting the 17    wearer from bullets, shot or other lethal projectiles;18        (14) the defendant held a position of trust or 19    supervision such as, but not limited to, family member as 20    defined in Section 11-0.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 21    teacher, scout leader, baby sitter, or day care worker, in 22    relation to a victim under 18 years of age, and the 23    defendant committed an offense in violation of Section 24    11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-6, 11-11, 25    11-14.4 except for an offense that involves keeping a 26    place of juvenile prostitution, 11-15.1, 11-19.1, 11-19.2,   SB0046- 4 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1    11-20.1, 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15 2    or 12-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 3    of 2012 against that victim;4        (15) the defendant committed an offense related to the 5    activities of an organized gang. For the purposes of this 6    factor, "organized gang" has the meaning ascribed to it in 7    Section 10 of the Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus Prevention 8    Act;9        (16) the defendant committed an offense in violation 10    of one of the following Sections while in a school, 11    regardless of the time of day or time of year; on any 12    conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a school to 13    transport students to or from school or a school related 14    activity; on the real property of a school; or on a public 15    way within 1,000 feet of the real property comprising any 16    school: Section 10-1, 10-2, 10-5, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 17    11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-14.4, 11-15.1, 11-17.1, 18    11-18.1, 11-19.1, 11-19.2, 12-2, 12-4, 12-4.1, 12-4.2, 19    12-4.3, 12-6, 12-6.1, 12-6.5, 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 20    12-15, 12-16, 18-2, or 33A-2, or Section 12-3.05 except 21    for subdivision (a)(4) or (g)(1), of the Criminal Code of 22    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;23        (16.5) the defendant committed an offense in violation 24    of one of the following Sections while in a day care 25    center, regardless of the time of day or time of year; on 26    the real property of a day care center, regardless of the   SB0046- 5 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1    time of day or time of year; or on a public way within 2    1,000 feet of the real property comprising any day care 3    center, regardless of the time of day or time of year: 4    Section 10-1, 10-2, 10-5, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 5    11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-14.4, 11-15.1, 11-17.1, 11-18.1, 6    11-19.1, 11-19.2, 12-2, 12-4, 12-4.1, 12-4.2, 12-4.3, 7    12-6, 12-6.1, 12-6.5, 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, 12-16, 8    18-2, or 33A-2, or Section 12-3.05 except for subdivision 9    (a)(4) or (g)(1), of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 10    Criminal Code of 2012;11        (17) the defendant committed the offense by reason of 12    any person's activity as a community policing volunteer or 13    to prevent any person from engaging in activity as a 14    community policing volunteer. For the purpose of this 15    Section, "community policing volunteer" has the meaning 16    ascribed to it in Section 2-3.5 of the Criminal Code of 17    2012;18        (18) the defendant committed the offense in a nursing 19    home or on the real property comprising a nursing home. 20    For the purposes of this paragraph (18), "nursing home" 21    means a skilled nursing or intermediate long term care 22    facility that is subject to license by the Illinois 23    Department of Public Health under the Nursing Home Care 24    Act, the Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 25    2013, the ID/DD Community Care Act, or the MC/DD Act;26        (19) the defendant was a federally licensed firearm   SB0046- 6 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1    dealer and was previously convicted of a violation of 2    subsection (a) of Section 3 of the Firearm Owners 3    Identification Card Act and has now committed either a 4    felony violation of the Firearm Owners Identification Card 5    Act or an act of armed violence while armed with a firearm;6        (20) the defendant (i) committed the offense of 7    reckless homicide under Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code 8    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or the offense of 9    driving under the influence of alcohol, other drug or 10    drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds or any 11    combination thereof under Section 11-501 of the Illinois 12    Vehicle Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance 13    and (ii) was operating a motor vehicle in excess of 20 14    miles per hour over the posted speed limit as provided in 15    Article VI of Chapter 11 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; 16        (21) the defendant (i) committed the offense of 17    reckless driving or aggravated reckless driving under 18    Section 11-503 of the Illinois Vehicle Code and (ii) was 19    operating a motor vehicle in excess of 20 miles per hour 20    over the posted speed limit as provided in Article VI of 21    Chapter 11 of the Illinois Vehicle Code;22        (22) the defendant committed the offense against a 23    person that the defendant knew, or reasonably should have 24    known, was a member of the Armed Forces of the United 25    States serving on active duty. For purposes of this clause 26    (22), the term "Armed Forces" means any of the Armed   SB0046- 7 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1    Forces of the United States, including a member of any 2    reserve component thereof or National Guard unit called to 3    active duty; 4        (23) the defendant committed the offense against a 5    person who was elderly or infirm or who was a person with a 6    disability by taking advantage of a family or fiduciary 7    relationship with the elderly or infirm person or person 8    with a disability; 9        (24) the defendant committed any offense under Section 10    11-20.1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 11    of 2012 and possessed 100 or more images; 12        (25) the defendant committed the offense while the 13    defendant or the victim was in a train, bus, or other 14    vehicle used for public transportation;15        (26) the defendant committed the offense of child 16    pornography or aggravated child pornography, specifically 17    including paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), or (7) of 18    subsection (a) of Section 11-20.1 of the Criminal Code of 19    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 where a child engaged in, 20    solicited for, depicted in, or posed in any act of sexual 21    penetration or bound, fettered, or subject to sadistic, 22    masochistic, or sadomasochistic abuse in a sexual context 23    and specifically including paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), 24    (5), or (7) of subsection (a) of Section 11-20.1B or 25    Section 11-20.3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 where a child 26    engaged in, solicited for, depicted in, or posed in any   SB0046- 8 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1    act of sexual penetration or bound, fettered, or subject 2    to sadistic, masochistic, or sadomasochistic abuse in a 3    sexual context;4        (26.5) the defendant committed the offense of obscene 5    depiction of a purported child, specifically including 6    paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 11-20.4 of the 7    Criminal Code of 2012 if a child engaged in, solicited 8    for, depicted in, or posed in any act of sexual 9    penetration or bound, fettered, or subject to sadistic, 10    masochistic, or sadomasochistic abuse in a sexual context; 11        (27) the defendant committed the offense of first 12    degree murder, assault, aggravated assault, battery, 13    aggravated battery, robbery, armed robbery, or aggravated 14    robbery against a person who was a veteran and the 15    defendant knew, or reasonably should have known, that the 16    person was a veteran performing duties as a representative 17    of a veterans' organization. For the purposes of this 18    paragraph (27), "veteran" means an Illinois resident who 19    has served as a member of the United States Armed Forces, a 20    member of the Illinois National Guard, or a member of the 21    United States Reserve Forces; and "veterans' organization" 22    means an organization comprised of members of which 23    substantially all are individuals who are veterans or 24    spouses, widows, or widowers of veterans, the primary 25    purpose of which is to promote the welfare of its members 26    and to provide assistance to the general public in such a   SB0046- 9 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1    way as to confer a public benefit; 2        (28) the defendant committed the offense of assault, 3    aggravated assault, battery, aggravated battery, robbery, 4    armed robbery, or aggravated robbery against a person that 5    the defendant knew or reasonably should have known was a 6    letter carrier or postal worker while that person was 7    performing his or her duties delivering mail for the 8    United States Postal Service;9        (29) the defendant committed the offense of criminal 10    sexual assault, aggravated criminal sexual assault, 11    criminal sexual abuse, or aggravated criminal sexual abuse 12    against a victim with an intellectual disability, and the 13    defendant holds a position of trust, authority, or 14    supervision in relation to the victim;15        (30) the defendant committed the offense of promoting 16    juvenile prostitution, patronizing a prostitute, or 17    patronizing a minor engaged in prostitution and at the 18    time of the commission of the offense knew that the 19    prostitute or minor engaged in prostitution was in the 20    custody or guardianship of the Department of Children and 21    Family Services;22        (31) the defendant (i) committed the offense of 23    driving while under the influence of alcohol, other drug 24    or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds or any 25    combination thereof in violation of Section 11-501 of the 26    Illinois Vehicle Code or a similar provision of a local   SB0046- 10 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1    ordinance and (ii) the defendant during the commission of 2    the offense was driving his or her vehicle upon a roadway 3    designated for one-way traffic in the opposite direction 4    of the direction indicated by official traffic control 5    devices; 6        (32) the defendant committed the offense of reckless 7    homicide while committing a violation of Section 11-907 of 8    the Illinois Vehicle Code; 9        (33) the defendant was found guilty of an 10    administrative infraction related to an act or acts of 11    public indecency or sexual misconduct in the penal 12    institution. In this paragraph (33), "penal institution" 13    has the same meaning as in Section 2-14 of the Criminal 14    Code of 2012; or15        (34) the defendant committed the offense of leaving 16    the scene of a crash in violation of subsection (b) of 17    Section 11-401 of the Illinois Vehicle Code and the crash 18    resulted in the death of a person and at the time of the 19    offense, the defendant was: (i) driving under the 20    influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, intoxicating 21    compound or compounds or any combination thereof as 22    defined by Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; or 23    (ii) operating the motor vehicle while using an electronic 24    communication device as defined in Section 12-610.2 of the 25    Illinois Vehicle Code. 26    For the purposes of this Section:  SB0046- 11 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1    "School" is defined as a public or private elementary or 2secondary school, community college, college, or university.3    "Day care center" means a public or private State 4certified and licensed day care center as defined in Section 52.09 of the Child Care Act of 1969 that displays a sign in 6plain view stating that the property is a day care center.7    "Intellectual disability" means significantly subaverage 8intellectual functioning which exists concurrently with 9impairment in adaptive behavior. 10    "Public transportation" means the transportation or 11conveyance of persons by means available to the general 12public, and includes paratransit services.13    "Traffic control devices" means all signs, signals, 14markings, and devices that conform to the Illinois Manual on 15Uniform Traffic Control Devices, placed or erected by 16authority of a public body or official having jurisdiction, 17for the purpose of regulating, warning, or guiding traffic. 18    (b) The following factors, related to all felonies, may be 19considered by the court as reasons to impose an extended term 20sentence under Section 5-8-2 upon any offender:21        (1) When a defendant is convicted of any felony, after 22    having been previously convicted in Illinois or any other 23    jurisdiction of the same or similar class felony or 24    greater class felony, when such conviction has occurred 25    within 10 years after the previous conviction, excluding 26    time spent in custody, and such charges are separately   SB0046- 12 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1    brought and tried and arise out of different series of 2    acts; or3        (2) When a defendant is convicted of any felony and 4    the court finds that the offense was accompanied by 5    exceptionally brutal or heinous behavior indicative of 6    wanton cruelty; or7        (3) When a defendant is convicted of any felony 8    committed against:9            (i) a person under 12 years of age at the time of 10        the offense or such person's property;11            (ii) a person 60 years of age or older at the time 12        of the offense or such person's property; or13            (iii) a person who had a physical disability at 14        the time of the offense or such person's property; or15        (4) When a defendant is convicted of any felony and 16    the offense involved any of the following types of 17    specific misconduct committed as part of a ceremony, rite, 18    initiation, observance, performance, practice or activity 19    of any actual or ostensible religious, fraternal, or 20    social group:21            (i) the brutalizing or torturing of humans or 22        animals;23            (ii) the theft of human corpses;24            (iii) the kidnapping of humans;25            (iv) the desecration of any cemetery, religious, 26        fraternal, business, governmental, educational, or   SB0046- 13 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1        other building or property; or2            (v) ritualized abuse of a child; or3        (5) When a defendant is convicted of a felony other 4    than conspiracy and the court finds that the felony was 5    committed under an agreement with 2 or more other persons 6    to commit that offense and the defendant, with respect to 7    the other individuals, occupied a position of organizer, 8    supervisor, financier, or any other position of management 9    or leadership, and the court further finds that the felony 10    committed was related to or in furtherance of the criminal 11    activities of an organized gang or was motivated by the 12    defendant's leadership in an organized gang; or13        (6) When a defendant is convicted of an offense 14    committed while using a firearm with a laser sight 15    attached to it. For purposes of this paragraph, "laser 16    sight" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 26-7 of 17    the Criminal Code of 2012; or18        (7) When a defendant who was at least 17 years of age 19    at the time of the commission of the offense is convicted 20    of a felony and has been previously adjudicated a 21    delinquent minor under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for 22    an act that if committed by an adult would be a Class X or 23    Class 1 felony when the conviction has occurred within 10 24    years after the previous adjudication, excluding time 25    spent in custody; or26        (8) When a defendant commits any felony and the   SB0046- 14 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1    defendant used, possessed, exercised control over, or 2    otherwise directed an animal to assault a law enforcement 3    officer engaged in the execution of his or her official 4    duties or in furtherance of the criminal activities of an 5    organized gang in which the defendant is engaged; or 6        (9) When a defendant commits any felony and the 7    defendant knowingly video or audio records the offense 8    with the intent to disseminate the recording. 9    (c) The following factors may be considered by the court 10as reasons to impose an extended term sentence under Section 115-8-2 (730 ILCS 5/5-8-2) upon any offender for the listed 12offenses:13        (1) When a defendant is convicted of first degree 14    murder, after having been previously convicted in Illinois 15    of any offense listed under paragraph (c)(2) of Section 16    5-5-3 (730 ILCS 5/5-5-3), when that conviction has 17    occurred within 10 years after the previous conviction, 18    excluding time spent in custody, and the charges are 19    separately brought and tried and arise out of different 20    series of acts.21        (1.5) When a defendant is convicted of first degree 22    murder, after having been previously convicted of domestic 23    battery (720 ILCS 5/12-3.2) or aggravated domestic battery 24    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.3) committed on the same victim or after 25    having been previously convicted of violation of an order 26    of protection (720 ILCS 5/12-30) in which the same victim   SB0046- 15 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1    was the protected person. 2        (2) When a defendant is convicted of voluntary 3    manslaughter, second degree murder, involuntary 4    manslaughter, or reckless homicide in which the defendant 5    has been convicted of causing the death of more than one 6    individual.7        (3) When a defendant is convicted of aggravated 8    criminal sexual assault or criminal sexual assault, when 9    there is a finding that aggravated criminal sexual assault 10    or criminal sexual assault was also committed on the same 11    victim by one or more other individuals, and the defendant 12    voluntarily participated in the crime with the knowledge 13    of the participation of the others in the crime, and the 14    commission of the crime was part of a single course of 15    conduct during which there was no substantial change in 16    the nature of the criminal objective.17        (4) If the victim was under 18 years of age at the time 18    of the commission of the offense, when a defendant is 19    convicted of aggravated criminal sexual assault or 20    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child under 21    subsection (a)(1) of Section 11-1.40 or subsection (a)(1) 22    of Section 12-14.1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 23    Criminal Code of 2012 (720 ILCS 5/11-1.40 or 5/12-14.1).24        (5) When a defendant is convicted of a felony 25    violation of Section 24-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or 26    the Criminal Code of 2012 (720 ILCS 5/24-1) and there is a   SB0046- 16 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1    finding that the defendant is a member of an organized 2    gang.3        (6) When a defendant was convicted of unlawful 4    possession of weapons under Section 24-1 of the Criminal 5    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 (720 ILCS 5/24-1) 6    for possessing a weapon that is not readily 7    distinguishable as one of the weapons enumerated in 8    Section 24-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 9    Code of 2012 (720 ILCS 5/24-1).10        (7) When a defendant is convicted of an offense 11    involving the illegal manufacture of a controlled 12    substance under Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled 13    Substances Act (720 ILCS 570/401), the illegal manufacture 14    of methamphetamine under Section 25 of the Methamphetamine 15    Control and Community Protection Act (720 ILCS 646/25), or 16    the illegal possession of explosives and an emergency 17    response officer in the performance of his or her duties 18    is killed or injured at the scene of the offense while 19    responding to the emergency caused by the commission of 20    the offense. In this paragraph, "emergency" means a 21    situation in which a person's life, health, or safety is 22    in jeopardy; and "emergency response officer" means a 23    peace officer, community policing volunteer, fireman, 24    emergency medical technician-ambulance, emergency medical 25    technician-intermediate, emergency medical 26    technician-paramedic, ambulance driver, other medical   SB0046- 17 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1    assistance or first aid personnel, or hospital emergency 2    room personnel. 3        (8) When the defendant is convicted of attempted mob 4    action, solicitation to commit mob action, or conspiracy 5    to commit mob action under Section 8-1, 8-2, or 8-4 of the 6    Criminal Code of 2012, where the criminal object is a 7    violation of Section 25-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 8    and an electronic communication is used in the commission 9    of the offense. For the purposes of this paragraph (8), 10    "electronic communication" shall have the meaning provided 11    in Section 26.5-0.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 12    (d) For the purposes of this Section, "organized gang" has 13the meaning ascribed to it in Section 10 of the Illinois 14Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus Prevention Act.15    (e) The court may impose an extended term sentence under 16Article 4.5 of Chapter V upon an offender who has been 17convicted of a felony violation of Section 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 1811-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, or 1912-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 20when the victim of the offense is under 18 years of age at the 21time of the commission of the offense and, during the 22commission of the offense, the victim was under the influence 23of alcohol, regardless of whether or not the alcohol was 24supplied by the offender; and the offender, at the time of the 25commission of the offense, knew or should have known that the 26victim had consumed alcohol.   SB0046- 18 -LRB104 06322 RLC 16357 b1(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 2103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 103-825, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.)